Hawaii statutes.
§463-13 Exemptions. [Repeal and
reenactment on July 1, 2016. L 2010, c 208, §8.] This chapter does not
apply to any person, firm, company, partnership, or corporation or any bureau
or agency whose business is exclusively the furnishing of information as to the
business and financial standing and credit responsibility of persons, firms, or
corporations, or as to personal habits and financial responsibility, of
applicants for insurance, indemnity bonds, or commercial credit, or an
attorney-at-law in performing the attorney's duties as such attorney-at-law. [L
1961, c 77, pt of §1; Supp, §165A-13; HRS §463-13; gen ch 1985; am L 2010, c
208, §5]

Note

Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2016, by L 2010, c 208, §8
deleted by L 2014, c 94, §3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next